Maryland, session 2026, HB1642.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Education
11–409.
(A) (1) IN THIS SECTION THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE MEANINGS
INDICATED.
(2) “INDEPENDENT CONSENSUS–BASED STANDARDS” MEANS
METHODOLOGIES, SPECIFICATIONS, REGULATORY SOLUTIONS, AND TECHNICAL
STANDARDS DEVELOPED COLLABORATIVELY BY INSTITUTIONS OF HIGHER
EDUCATION, RESEARCH ENTITIES, OR STAKEHOLDER GROUPS THROUGH A
STRUCTURED PROCESS.
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb1642*

HOUSE BILL 1642
(3) “TRANSFORMATIVE ECONOMIC EFFICIENCY” MEANS
MEASURABLE IMPROVEMENT IN ECONOMIC PERFORMANCE, RESOURCE
UTILIZATION, AND HEALTH RISK PREVENTION ACHIEVED THROUGH EDUCATION
AND RESEARCH–INFORMED PRACTICES.
(B) (1) THE COMMISSION SHALL ESTABLISH A FRAMEWORK FOR
TRANSFORMATIVE ECONOMIC EFFICIENCY.
(2) THE PURPOSE OF THE FRAMEWORK IS TO OPTIMIZE
INDEPENDENT CONTINUOUS LEARNING AND ENCOURAGE TRANSFORMATIVE
ECONOMIC EFFICIENCY THROUGH THE DEVELOPMENT AND UTILIZATION OF
INDEPENDENT CONSENSUS–BASED STANDARDS.
(C) THE COMMISSION SHALL DEVELOP THE INDEPENDENT
CONSENSUS–BASED STANDARDS BY:
(1) RELYING ON INDEPENDENT RESEARCH AND REPRODUCIBLE
DATA;
(2) UTILIZING INDEPENDENT VERIFICATION, VALIDATION, AND
CALIBRATION METHODOLOGIES; AND
(3) SEEKING CONSENSUS AMONG STAKEHOLDERS, INCLUDING:
(I) INSTITUTIONS OF HIGHER EDUCATION;
(II) COMMUNITY–BASED RESEARCH INSTITUTIONS; AND
(III) RELEVANT SUBJECT MATTER EXPERTS.
(D) THE COMMISSION SHALL:
(1) POST THE INDEPENDENT CONSENSUS–BASED STANDARDS ON ITS
WEBSITE; AND
(2) PERIODICALLY UPDATE THE INDEPENDENT CONSENSUS–BASED
STANDARDS.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2026.